Louisiana, session 2026, HB1190.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:1551(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1551. Disposition of remains
B. If a decedent's remains are not claimed, unclaimed, or abandoned, and the
decedent had known assets or property of a sufficient value to defray the expenses
of disposition, the coroner shall arrange for disposition of the remains within thirty
forty-five days, preferably by a recognized funeral establishment. The invoices for
the expenses of disposition shall be forwarded to the public administrator if there is
one in the parish or to the clerk of the district court if there is no public
administrator, and the person or official authorized by law to be appointed
administrator of the succession of the decedent shall provide for the payment of the
disposition expenses out of the assets of the decedent in accordance with the existing
provisions of law for the administration of successions and in accordance with the
provisions of this Part.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2715 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1190